customize_system/packages/guadalinex-openoffice2.1-conf/guadalinex-openoffice2.1-conf-0.1/gcs/conffiles_skel/opt/openoffice.org2.1/share/dict/ooo/es_ES.aff
SFX W   erbar ierba       erbar
SFX W   ernar ierna       ernar
SFX W   errar ierra       errar
SFX W   ertar ierta       ertar
SFX W   esar  iesa        esar
SFX W   estar iesta       estar
SFX W   etar  ieta        etar
SFX W   ezar  ieza        ezar
SFX W   ijar  íja         [ae]hijar
SFX W   ilar  íla         [ae]hilar
SFX W   inar  ína         [aeo]hinar
SFX W   itar  íta         [ae]hitar
SFX W   umar  úma         [ae]humar
SFX W   usar  úsa         [ae]husar
SFX W   izar  íza         [ae]izar
SFX W   uar   úa          [^g]uar
SFX W   ar    a           guar
SFX W   onzar üenza       gonzar
SFX W   obar  ueba        obar
SFX W   oblar uebla       oblar
SFX W   ocar  ueca        ocar
SFX W   odar  ueda        odar
SFX W   ogar  uega        ogar
SFX W   olar  uela        olar
SFX W   ollar uella       [^g]ollar
SFX W   oldar üelda       goldar
SFX W   oldar uelda       [^g]oldar
SFX W   ollar üella       gollar
SFX W   olcar uelca       olcar
SFX W   olgar uelga       olgar
SFX W   oltar uelta       oltar
SFX W   onar  uena        onar
SFX W   oñar  ueña        oñar
SFX W   ontar uenta       ontar
SFX W   ontrar uentra      ontrar
SFX W   orar  uera        [^g]orar
SFX W   orar  üera        gorar
SFX W   orcar uerca       orcar
SFX W   ordar uerda       ordar
SFX W   ornar uerna       ornar
SFX W   ortar uerta       ortar
SFX W   orzar uerza       orzar
SFX W   osar  uesa        osar
SFX W   ostar uesta       ostar
SFX W   ostrar uestra      ostrar
SFX W   ovar  ueva        ovar
SFX W   gar   ega         ugar
SFX W   er    e           a[bcl]er
SFX W   er    e           [cr]aer
SFX W   er    e           ecer
SFX W   eder  iede        eder
SFX W   er    e           [eo]er
SFX W   ender iende       ender
SFX W   ener  iene        ener
SFX W   erder ierde       erder
SFX W   erer  iere        erer
SFX W   erner ierne       erner
SFX W   erter ierte       erter
SFX W   ocer  uece        cocer
SFX W   er    e           [^c]ocer
SFX W   oder  uede        oder
SFX W   oler  uele        oler
SFX W   olver uelve       olver
SFX W   er    e           oner
SFX W   orcer uerce       orcer
SFX W   order uerde       order
SFX W   over  ueve        over
SFX W   ir    e           alir
SFX W   ebir  ibe         ebir
SFX W   ecir  ice         ecir
SFX W   edir  ide         edir
SFX W   egir  ige         egir
SFX W   emir  ime         emir
SFX W   eír   íe          eír
SFX W   eñir  iñe         eñir
SFX W   eguir igue        eguir
SFX W   enchir inche       enchir
SFX W   endir inde        endir
SFX W   enir  iene        enir
SFX W   entir iente       entir
SFX W   erir  iere        erir
SFX W   ernir ierne       ernir
SFX W   ertir ierte       ertir
SFX W   ervir irve        [^h]ervir
SFX W   etir  ite         etir
SFX W   estir iste        estir
SFX W   unir  úne         eunir
SFX W   ervir ierve       hervir
SFX W   irir  iere        irir
SFX W   ibir  íbe         ohibir
SFX W   ír    ye          oír
SFX W   orir  uere        orir
SFX W   ormir uerme       ormir
SFX W   ir    e           ucir
SFX W   uir   uye         [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uye         güir
SFX W   ir    e           ullir
SFX W   ir    e           uñir
SFX W   r     mos         r
SFX W   ar    áis         ar
SFX W   er    éis         er
SFX W   ir    ís          ir
SFX W   ír    ís          ír
SFX W   iar   ían         iar
SFX W   ebrar iebran      ebrar
SFX W   edrar iedran      edrar
SFX W   egar  iegan       egar
SFX W   elar  ielan       elar
SFX W   evar  ievan       evar
SFX W   emblar iemblan     emblar
SFX W   embrar iembran     embrar
SFX W   r     n           andar
SFX W   endar iendan      endar
SFX W   endrar iendran     endrar
SFX W   engar iengan      engar
SFX W   ensar iensan      ensar
SFX W   entar ientan      entar
SFX W   enzar ienzan      enzar
SFX W   erbar ierban      erbar
SFX W   ernar iernan      ernar
SFX W   errar ierran      errar
SFX W   ertar iertan      ertar
SFX W   esar  iesan       esar
SFX W   estar iestan      estar
SFX W   etar  ietan       etar
SFX W   ezar  iezan       ezar
SFX W   ijar  íjan        [ae]hijar
SFX W   ilar  ílan        [ae]hilar
SFX W   inar  ínan        [aeo]hinar
SFX W   itar  ítan        [ae]hitar
SFX W   umar  úman        [ae]humar
SFX W   usar  úsan        [ae]husar
SFX W   izar  ízan        [ae]izar
SFX W   onzar üenzan      gonzar
SFX W   obar  ueban       obar
SFX W   oblar ueblan      oblar
SFX W   ocar  uecan       ocar
SFX W   odar  uedan       odar
SFX W   ogar  uegan       ogar
SFX W   olar  uelan       olar
SFX W   oldar üeldan      goldar
SFX W   oldar ueldan      [^g]oldar
SFX W   ollar üellan      gollar
SFX W   ollar uellan      [^g]ollar
SFX W   r     n           guar
SFX W   uar   úan         [^g]uar
SFX W   olcar uelcan      olcar
SFX W   olgar uelgan      olgar
SFX W   oltar ueltan      oltar
SFX W   onar  uenan       onar
SFX W   oñar  ueñan       oñar
SFX W   ontar uentan      ontar
SFX W   ontrar uentran     ontrar
SFX W   orar  ueran       [^g]orar
SFX W   orar  üeran       gorar
SFX W   orcar uercan      orcar
SFX W   ordar uerdan      ordar
SFX W   ornar uernan      ornar
SFX W   ortar uertan      ortar
SFX W   orzar uerzan      orzar
SFX W   osar  uesan       osar
SFX W   ostar uestan      ostar
SFX W   ostrar uestran     ostrar
SFX W   ovar  uevan       ovar
SFX W   gar   egan        ugar
SFX W   r     n           a[bcl]er
SFX W   r     n           [cr]aer
SFX W   r     n           ecer
SFX W   eder  ieden       eder
SFX W   r     n           [eo]er
SFX W   ender ienden      ender
SFX W   ener  ienen       ener
SFX W   erder ierden      erder
SFX W   erer  ieren       erer
SFX W   erner iernen      erner
SFX W   erter ierten      erter
SFX W   ocer  uecen       cocer
SFX W   r     n           [^c]ocer
SFX W   oder  ueden       oder
SFX W   oler  uelen       oler
SFX W   olver uelven      olver
SFX W   r     n           oner
SFX W   orcer uercen      orcer
SFX W   order uerden      order
SFX W   over  ueven       over
SFX W   ir    en          alir
SFX W   ebir  iben        ebir
SFX W   ecir  icen        ecir
SFX W   edir  iden        edir
SFX W   egir  igen        egir
SFX W   emir  imen        emir
SFX W   eír   íen         eír
SFX W   eñir  iñen        eñir
SFX W   eguir iguen       eguir
SFX W   enchir inchen      enchir
SFX W   endir inden       endir
SFX W   enir  ienen       enir
SFX W   entir ienten      entir
SFX W   erir  ieren       erir
SFX W   ernir iernen      ernir
SFX W   ertir ierten      ertir
SFX W   ervir irven       [^h]ervir
SFX W   estir isten       estir
SFX W   unir  únen        eunir
SFX W   etir  iten        etir
SFX W   ervir ierven      hervir
SFX W   irir  ieren       irir
SFX W   ibir  íben        ohibir
SFX W   ír    yen         oír
SFX W   orir  ueren       orir
SFX W   ormir uermen      ormir
SFX W   ir    en          ucir
SFX W   ir    yen         [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyen        güir
SFX W   ir    en          ullir
SFX W   ir    en          uñir
SFX W   r     ba          ar
SFX W   er    ía          er
SFX W   ir    ía          ir
SFX W   ír    ía          ír
SFX W   r     bas         ar
SFX W   er    ías         er
SFX W   ir    ías         ir
SFX W   ír    ías         ír
SFX W   ar    ábamos      ar
SFX W   er    íamos       er
SFX W   ir    íamos       ir
SFX W   ír    íamos       ír
SFX W   r     bais        ar
SFX W   er    íais        er
SFX W   ir    íais        ir
SFX W   ír    íais        ír
SFX W   r     ban         ar
SFX W   er    ían         er
SFX W   ir    ían         ir
SFX W   ír    ían         ír
SFX W   car   qué         car
SFX W   ar    ué          gar
SFX W   zar   cé          zar
SFX W   ar    uve         andar
SFX W   ar    é           [^a]ndar
SFX W   ar    é           [^n]dar
SFX W   ar    é           [^cguzd]ar
SFX W   ar    é           [^g]uar
SFX W   uar   üé          guar
SFX W   er    í           [^fh]acer
SFX W   aber  upe         aber
SFX W   acer  ice         [fh]acer
SFX W   er    í           aler
SFX W   er    í           caer
